New Jersey, session 222, A788.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Each Executive Branch department, agency, and instrumentality shall establish an inventory of regulations, policies, guidelines, waivers, plans, programs, directives, and any other actions developed in response to the COVID-19 pandemic and the subsequent executive orders declaring a state of emergency and public health emergency and shall assess the effectiveness of such measures, their applicability to potential future emergency scenarios, and promulgate rules and regulations, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), or take any other actions as shall be necessary to implement such measures in a manner which effectuates a rapid and effective response to potential future emergency scenarios. b.    One year following the effective date of this act, P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and annually thereafter, each Executive Branch department, agency, and instrumentality shall provide a report to the Governor, and submit that report to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), which identifies such measures, provides an assessment of the effectiveness of such measures, details plans for the implementation of such measures in response to potential future emergency scenarios, and makes such recommendations for legislation or executive actions as may be deemed appropriate.  Each report shall be made available to the public by posting the report on the web sites of the department, office, or agency. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.